Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-23] Mortgages, trust deeds,
and other securities. (a) This section applies solely to obligations
secured by mortgage, trust deed, or other security in the nature of a mortgage
upon real or personal property owned by a person in military service before or
at the commencement of the period of the military service and still owned by
the person.

(b) In any proceeding commenced in any court
during the period of military service to enforce that obligation arising out of
nonpayment of any sum due or out of any other breach of the terms occurring
prior to or during the period of the person's military service, the court may,
after hearing and on its own motion, or shall, on application to it by the
person in military service or some person on behalf of the person in military
service, unless in the opinion of the court the ability of the defendant to
comply with the terms of the obligation is not materially affected by reason of
the defendant's military service:

(1) Stay the proceedings as provided in this chapter;
or

(2) Make such other disposition of the case as may be
equitable to conserve the interests of all parties.

(c) No sale, foreclosure, or seizure of
property for nonpayment of any sum due under any such obligation, or for any
other breach of the terms thereof, whether under a power of sale, under a
judgment entered upon warrant of attorney to confess judgment contained
therein, shall be valid if made during the period of military service or within
sixty days thereafter, except pursuant to an agreement as provided in section
657D-6, unless upon an order previously granted by the court and a return
thereto made and approved by the court.

Any person who knowingly makes, attempts, or
causes to be made any such sale, foreclosure, or seizure of property, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next